Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-515
Applicability of laws.

All provisions of law, now applicable to electric light and power corporations as regards the use and occupation of the public highways, and the manner or method of construction and physical operation of plants, systems, and transmission lines, shall be applicable, as nearly as may be, to municipalities and public electric light and power districts in their exercise of the powers and functions, and in their performance of the duties, conferred or imposed upon them under the provisions of sections 70-501 to 70-515.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 9;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 9, p. 342;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-609;

R.S.1943, § 70-515;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 105, p. 496.

Public power and irrigation district has the right to exercise the power of eminent domain in the acquisition of property. Snyder v. Platte Valley Public Power & Irr. Dist., 144 Neb. 308, 13 N.W.2d 160 (1944).